Maryland, session 2026, SB0405.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
2–1303.
After making the distributions required under §§ 2–1301 through 2–1302.5 of this
subtitle, the Comptroller shall pay:
(1) revenues from the hotel surcharge into the Dorchester County
Economic Development Fund established under § 10–130 of the Economic Development
Article;
(2) TO THE CITY OF BALTIMORE, ONE–THIRD OF THE REVENUES
FROM SALES AND USE TAXES COLLECTED AND REMITTED FROM RETAIL SALES THAT
OCCUR WITHIN THE CITY OF BALTIMORE;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0405*

SENATE BILL 405
(3) to the Blueprint for Maryland’s Future Fund established under § 5–206
of the Education Article, the following percentage of the remaining sales and use tax
revenues:
(i) for fiscal year 2023, 9.2%;
(ii) for fiscal year 2024, 11.0%;
(iii) for fiscal year 2025, 11.3%;
(iv) for fiscal year 2026, 11.7%; and
(v) for fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, 12.1%; and
[(3)] (4) the remaining sales and use tax revenue into the General Fund
of the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.